Vermont statutes. Title 15B Uniform Interstate Family Support Act
Chapter 19. Application and Construction

§ 1901.
Uniformity.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.

§ 1902.
Transitional provisions.

The Uniform Interstate Family Support Act applies to proceedings begun on or after June 30, 2015 to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child support order or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, or determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.

§ 1903.
Vermont Rules of Family Proceedings.

The Vermont Rules of Family Proceedings shall apply to all proceedings before the tribunal of this State under this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 16

, § 2, eff. June 1, 2015.